Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-968
Retirement system; assets; funds; account; investment.

All assets of the retirement system shall be credited, according to the purpose for which they are held, to the Expense Fund, to the School Retirement Fund, or to the Contingent Account. Any money in the account or funds available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1945, c. 219, § 46, p. 653;

R.S.Supp.,1947, § 79-2946;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 479, p. 855;

Laws 1965, c. 530, § 5, p. 1668;

Laws 1967, c. 546, § 12, p. 1808;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 88, p. 2401;

Laws 1988, LB 1170, § 12;

Laws 1993, LB 292, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 90;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1545;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 603;

Laws 2002, LB 407, § 41.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.